Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.42.090

Abandonment of a dependent person—Defense.

It is an affirmative defense to the charge of abandonment of a dependent person, that the person employed to provide any of the basic necessities of life to the child or other dependent person, gave reasonable notice of termination of services and the services were not terminated until after the termination date specified in the notice. The notice must be given to the child or dependent person, and to other persons or organizations that have requested notice of termination of services furnished to the child or other dependent person.

The department of social and health services and the department of health shall adopt rules establishing procedures for termination of services to children and other dependent persons.

[ 1996 c 302 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1996 c 302: See note following RCW 9A.42.010.